apertium-tgl-ceb.tgl.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
 <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNÑNgOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnñngopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
 <sdefs>
  <sdef n="n"      c="Noun"/>
  <sdef n="np"     c="Proper noun"/>
  <sdef n="part"   c="Particle"/>
  <sdef n="prn"    c="Pronoun"/>
  <sdef n="adj"    c="Adjective"/>
  <sdef n="det"    c="Determiner"/>
  <sdef n="pr"     c="Preposition"/>
  <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
  <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>
  <sdef n="prn"    c="Pronoun"/>

  <sdef n="al"     c="Other"/>
  <sdef n="top"    c="Toponym"/>
  <sdef n="ant"    c="Anthroponym"/>

  <sdef n="p1"/>
  <sdef n="p1i"/>
  <sdef n="p1x"/>
  <sdef n="p2"/>
  <sdef n="p3"/>

  <sdef n="neg"    c="Negative"/>

  <sdef n="dem"    c="Demonstrative"/>

  <sdef n="sg"/>
  <sdef n="du"/>
  <sdef n="pl"/>

  <sdef n="abs"    c="Absolutive"/>
  <sdef n="erg"    c="Ergative"/>
  <sdef n="obl"    c="Oblique"/>
  <sdef n="loc"    c="Locative"/>
  <sdef n="exi"    c="Existential"/>
 </sdefs>
 <pardefs>

  <!-- Particles -->
  <pardef n="mga__part">
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="part"/></r></p></e> 
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="hindi__part">
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="part"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e> 
  </pardef>
 
  <!-- Prepositions -->

  <pardef n="sa__pr">
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e> 
  </pardef>

  <!-- Conjunctions -->

  <pardef n="at__cnjcoo">
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e> 
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="dahil__cnjsub">
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e> 
  </pardef>

  <!-- Determiners -->

  <pardef n="ang__det">
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="det"/></r></p></e> 
  </pardef>

  <!-- Pronouns -->

  <pardef n="/ako__prn">
   <e><p><l>ako</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>ko</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>akin</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>kita</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>kata</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>nita</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>nata</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>kanita</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>kanata</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>tayo</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1i"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>natin</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1i"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>atin</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1i"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>kami</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1x"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>namin</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1x"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>amin</l><r>ako<s n="prn"/><s n="p1x"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="/ikaw__prn">
   <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>ikaw</l><r>ikaw<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>ikaw</l><r>ikaw<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>ka</l><r>ikaw<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>mo</l><r>ikaw<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>iyo</l><r>ikaw<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>kayo</l><r>ikaw<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>ninyo</l><r>ikaw<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>inyo</l><r>ikaw<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="/siya__prn">
   <e><p><l>siya</l><r>siya<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>niya</l><r>siya<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>kaniya</l><r>siya<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

   <e><p><l>sila</l><r>siya<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>nila</l><r>siya<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>kanila</l><r>siya<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="/ito__prn">
   <e><p><l>ito</l><r>ito<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>nito</l><r>ito<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>dito</l><r>ito<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>rito</l><r>ito<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>nandito</l><r>ito<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>narito</l><r>ito<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>heto</l><r>ito<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="exi"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="/iyan__prn">
   <e><p><l>iyan</l><r>iyan<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>niyan</l><r>iyan<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>diyan</l><r>iyan<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>riyan</l><r>iyan<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>nandiyan</l><r>iyan<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>nariyan</l><r>iyan<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>ayan</l><r>iyan<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="exi"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="/iyon__prn">
   <e><p><l>iyon</l><r>iyon<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>niyon</l><r>iyon<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>doon</l><r>iyon<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>roon</l><r>iyon<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>nandoon</l><r>iyon<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
   <e r="LR"><p><l>naroon</l><r>iyon<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>ayon</l><r>iyon<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="exi"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <!-- Determiners -->

  <pardef n="malinis__adj">
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e> 
  </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="madali__adv">
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <!-- Nouns -->

  <pardef n="aso__n"> <!-- dog /-->
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="Dios__np">
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="Israel__np">
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="David__np">
   <e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
  </pardef>


 </pardefs>

  <e lm="mga"><i>mga</i><par n="mga__part"/></e>
  <e lm="ba"><i>ba</i><par n="mga__part"/></e>
  <e lm="na"><i>na</i><par n="mga__part"/></e>
  <e lm="pa"><i>pa</i><par n="mga__part"/></e>
  <e lm="ho"><i>ho</i><par n="mga__part"/></e>
  <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="mga__part"/></e>
  <e lm="kasi"><i>kasi</i><par n="mga__part"/></e>
  <e lm="lamang"><i>lamang</i><par n="mga__part"/></e>
  <e lm="man"><i>man</i><par n="mga__part"/></e>
  <e lm="din"><i>din</i><par n="mga__part"/></e>
  <e lm="hindi"><i>hindi</i><par n="hindi__part"/></e>
  <e lm="wala"><i>wala</i><par n="hindi__part"/></e>
  <e lm="huwag"><i>huwag</i><par n="hindi__part"/></e>
  <e lm="at"><i>at</i><par n="at__cnjcoo"/></e>
  <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="at__cnjcoo"/></e>
  <e lm="dahil"><i>dahil</i><par n="dahil__cnjsub"/></e>
  <e lm="sa"><i>sa</i><par n="sa__pr"/></e>
  <e lm="ng"><i>ng</i><par n="sa__pr"/></e>
  <e lm="ay"><i>ay</i><par n="sa__pr"/></e>
  <e lm="ni"><i>ni</i><par n="sa__pr"/></e>
  <e lm="sina"><i>sina</i><par n="sa__pr"/></e>
  <e lm="taga"><i>taga</i><par n="sa__pr"/></e>
  <e lm="nasa"><i>nasa</i><par n="sa__pr"/></e>
  <e lm="si"><i>si</i><par n="sa__pr"/></e>
  <e lm="ako"><i/><par n="/ako__prn"/></e>
  <e lm="ikaw"><i/><par n="/ikaw__prn"/></e>
  <e lm="siya"><i/><par n="/siya__prn"/></e>
  <e lm="ito"><i/><par n="/ito__prn"/></e>
  <e lm="iyan"><i/><par n="/iyan__prn"/></e>
  <e lm="iyon"><i/><par n="/iyon__prn"/></e>
  <e lm="ang"><i>ang</i><par n="ang__det"/></e>
  <e lm="paraan"><i>paraan</i><par n="aso__n"/></e>
  <e lm="kalunuran"><i>kalunuran</i><par n="aso__n"/></e>
  <e lm="dagat"><i>dagat</i><par n="aso__n"/></e>
  <e lm="manghihimagsik"><i>manghihimagsik</i><par n="aso__n"/></e>
  <e lm="kalungkutan"><i>kalungkutan</i><par n="aso__n"/></e>
  <e lm="kakampi"><i>kakampi</i><par n="aso__n"/></e>
  <e lm="manugang"><i>manugang</i><par n="aso__n"/></e>
  <e lm="timbangan"><i>timbangan</i><par n="aso__n"/></e>
  <e lm="pagtatagumpay"><i>pagtatagumpay</i><par n="aso__n"/></e>
  <e lm="maysakit"><i>maysakit</i><par n="aso__n"/></e>
  <e lm="silo"><i>silo</i><par n="aso__n"/></e>
  <e lm="ligaya"><i>ligaya</i><par n="aso__n"/></e>
  <e lm="Cristo"><i>Cristo</i><par n="Dios__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Ginoo"><i>Ginoo</i><par n="Dios__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Panginoon"><i>Panginoon</i><par n="Dios__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Satanas"><i>Satanas</i><par n="Dios__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Jesus"><i>Jesus</i><par n="Dios__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Dios"><i>Dios</i><par n="Dios__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Santo"><i>Santo</i><par n="Dios__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Hesus"><i>Hesus</i><par n="Dios__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Wikipedia"><i>Wikipedia</i><par n="Dios__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Arabia"><i>Arabia</i><par n="Israel__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Asia"><i>Asia</i><par n="Israel__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Eden"><i>Eden</i><par n="Israel__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Arabya"><i>Arabya</i><par n="Israel__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Asya"><i>Asya</i><par n="Israel__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Jerusalem"><i>Jerusalem</i><par n="Israel__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Babilonia"><i>Babilonia</i><par n="Israel__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Jordan"><i>Jordan</i><par n="Israel__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Jerico"><i>Jerico</i><par n="Israel__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Libano"><i>Libano</i><par n="Israel__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Hebron"><i>Hebron</i><par n="Israel__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Moises"><i>Moises</i><par n="David__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Saul"><i>Saul</i><par n="David__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Jacob"><i>Jacob</i><par n="David__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Aaron"><i>Aaron</i><par n="David__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Salomon"><i>Salomon</i><par n="David__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Jose"><i>Jose</i><par n="David__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Benjamin"><i>Benjamin</i><par n="David__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Pedro"><i>Pedro</i><par n="David__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Juan"><i>Juan</i><par n="David__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Jonathan"><i>Jonathan</i><par n="David__np"/></e>
  <e lm="Daniel"><i>Daniel</i><par n="David__np"/></e>
  <e lm="dili"><i>dili</i><par n="madali__adv"/></e>
  <e lm="halos"><i>halos</i><par n="madali__adv"/></e>
  <e lm="kahapon"><i>kahapon</i><par n="madali__adv"/></e>
  <e lm="lagi"><i>lagi</i><par n="madali__adv"/></e>
  <e lm="madali"><i>madali</i><par n="madali__adv"/></e>
  <e lm="makapito"><i>makapito</i><par n="madali__adv"/></e>
  <e lm="mana"><i>mana</i><par n="madali__adv"/></e>
  <e lm="muli"><i>muli</i><par n="madali__adv"/></e>
  <e lm="ngayon"><i>ngayon</i><par n="madali__adv"/></e>
  <e lm="pagkaraan"><i>pagkaraan</i><par n="madali__adv"/></e>
  <e lm="para"><i>para</i><par n="madali__adv"/></e>
  <e lm="roon"><i>roon</i><par n="madali__adv"/></e>
  <e lm="uli"><i>uli</i><par n="madali__adv"/></e>
  <e lm="nakapatong"><i>nakapatong</i><par n="malinis__adj"/></e>
  <e lm="pata"><i>pata</i><par n="malinis__adj"/></e>
  <e lm="nakagagaling"><i>nakagagaling</i><par n="malinis__adj"/></e>
  <e lm="pinili"><i>pinili</i><par n="malinis__adj"/></e>
  <e lm="maliit"><i>maliit</i><par n="malinis__adj"/></e>
  <e lm="kakayahan"><i>kakayahan</i><par n="malinis__adj"/></e>
  <e lm="matulin"><i>matulin</i><par n="malinis__adj"/></e>
  <e lm="gala"><i>gala</i><par n="malinis__adj"/></e>
  <e lm="ginawa"><i>ginawa</i><par n="malinis__adj"/></e>
  <e lm="hubo"><i>hubo</i><par n="malinis__adj"/></e>
  <e lm="habang"><i>habang</i><par n="malinis__adj"/></e>
  <e lm="makipot"><i>makipot</i><par n="malinis__adj"/></e>
